Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-164.01
Electronic certificate of title; changes authorized.

If a certificate of title is an electronic certificate of title record, upon application by an owner or a lienholder and payment of the fee prescribed in section 60-154, the following changes may be made to a certificate of title electronically and without printing a certificate of title:

(1) Changing the name of an owner to reflect a legal change of name;

(2) Removing the name of an owner with the consent of all owners and lienholders;

(3) Adding an additional owner with the consent of all owners and lienholders;

(4) Adding, changing, or removing a transfer-on-death beneficiary designation; or

(5) Allowing an owner that has elected to retain a salvage vehicle pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-173 to obtain a salvage branded certificate of title.

Laws 2017, LB263, § 19;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 28;

Laws 2021, LB113, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 11.